Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.040

Methods of filing agreements—Status of interstate agreements—Real party in interest—Actions.

Prior to its entry into force, an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall be filed with the county auditor or, alternatively, listed by subject on a public agency's website or other electronically retrievable public source. In the event that an agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter is between or among one or more public agencies of this state and one or more public agencies of another state or of the United States the agreement shall have the status of an interstate compact, but in any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, the public agencies party thereto shall be real parties in interest and the state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liability which it may incur by reason of being joined as a party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of performance, or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state.

[ 2006 c 32 s 1; 1995 c 22 s 1; 1992 c 161 s 5; 1967 c 239 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—1992 c 161: See note following RCW 70.44.450.